Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-224
Adjutant General; convey easement to the city of York.

(1) The Adjutant General is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the city of York, Nebraska, a permanent easement for the construction, reconstruction, inspection, maintenance, operation, and replacement of a sanitary sewer pipe for the passage of sewage water, together with all appurtenances, structures, and other applicable equipment pertaining to any sewer in, through, over, and under certain real estate legally described as follows:

The west two hundred fifty feet, more or less, of the east five hundred ten and one-half feet, more or less, of the north half of the southeast quarter of the northeast quarter of section 6, township 10 north, range 2 west of the 6th principal meridian, a part of the city of York, York County, Nebraska (State of Nebraska Armory site).

(2) The permanent easement for the sewage pipe conveyed in this section shall be ten feet in width and five feet on either side of the centerline, described as follows:

Beginning at a point on the north right-of-way line of sixth street and such point being seven and eighty-seven hundredths feet east of the southwest corner of the above described tract of land; thence in a northeasterly direction using a deflection angle to the left of twenty-eight degrees twenty minutes zero seconds from the northerly right-of-way line of sixth street a distance of six and ninety-seven hundredths feet to a point; thence northerly along a line which has a deflection angle to the left of sixty-one degrees forty minutes zero seconds from the last described course a distance of one hundred forty-five feet to a point; thence in a northwesterly direction along a line which has a deflection angle to the left of nineteen degrees seventeen minutes twenty-four seconds from the last described course a distance of forty-two and thirty-eight hundredths feet to a point on the westerly property line of such tract and such point being one hundred eighty-eight and thirty-one hundredths feet north of the southwest corner of such tract.

Laws 1980, LB 602, § 2.